Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4681.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 803f. (1) An individual who is a disabled veteran with an honorable discharge from the United States Armed Forces may apply to the secretary of state if the disabled veteran owns a private passenger motor vehicle, and the secretary of state may issue a either of the following: (a) A special registration plate inscribed with special identification numbers preceded by the letters "DV" and the words "disabled veteran" beneath the registration number. (b) A service or conflict registration plate with a special adhesive tab that displays the letters "DV" or the words "Disabled Veteran". The tab may be attached only to the service or conflict registration plate issued to the disabled veteran under this subdivision. (2) An application for a special registration plate described in subsection (1) (1)(a) or (b) must be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state, must not require a service fee under section 804, and must be accompanied by proof that the applicant was honorably discharged from the United States Armed Forces and 1 of the following: (a) If the applicant is a totally disabled veteran, that the applicant has been determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to have a service-connected total or permanent total disability rating for compensation. (b) If the applicant is a totally disabled veteran, that the applicant has been determined to have a service-connected total or permanent total disability rating and is receiving disability retirement pay from a branch of the United States Armed Forces. (c) If the applicant is a partially disabled veteran, that the applicant has been determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to have a service-connected disability rating of not less than 50%. (3) A special registration plate described in subsection (1)(a) or (b) that is issued to a totally disabled veteran described in subsection (2)(a) or (b) is exempt from the payment of the tax provided for in section 801. (4) A special registration plate described in subsection (1)(a) or (b) that is issued to a totally disabled veteran described in subsection (2)(a) or (b) expires on the birthday of the totally disabled veteran in a year in which new plates are issued by the secretary of state. Application for renewal of the special registration plate must not require a service fee under section 804. The applicant is not required to furnish the proof provided in subsection (2) for renewal. (5) A special registration plate described in subsection (1)(a) or (b) that is issued to a partially disabled veteran described in subsection (2)(c) expires as provided in section 226, and a partially disabled veteran shall apply for renewal of the special registration plate as provided in section 226. The applicant is not required to furnish the proof provided in subsection (2) for renewal. (6) The surviving spouse of an individual who is a disabled veteran with a service-connected disability rating from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs of not less than 50% and an honorable discharge from the United States Armed Forces may use a special registration plate or service or conflict plate issued under this section after the death of the disabled veteran. The surviving spouse may renew a special registration plate or service or conflict plate issued under this section after the death of the disabled veteran in the same manner as provided under this section for a disabled veteran with the same service-connected disability rating as the deceased disabled veteran. If applicable, a surviving spouse must apply for registration of the vehicle on which the surviving spouse wishes to place the disabled veteran plate or service or conflict plate before using or renewing the plate as described in this section. (7) If applicable, the secretary of state may issue to a disabled veteran who has been issued a special registration plate or a service or conflict registration plate under this section a tab for persons with disabilities. The tab for persons with disabilities must be an adhesive tab that displays the international wheelchair symbol or a reasonable facsimile of that symbol. The tab for persons with disabilities may be attached only to the special registration plate or the service or conflict registration plate issued to the disabled veteran under this section. (8) An application for a tab for persons with disabilities must be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall require the same proof that the applicant is a disabled person as is required for issuance of a permanent windshield placard under section 675. If the surviving spouse of a disabled veteran is a disabled person, the surviving spouse may apply to the secretary of state for a tab for persons with disabilities in the same manner as provided for a disabled veteran under this subsection. (9) A tab for persons with disabilities issued under subsection (7) must be issued free of charge. (10) If a disabled veteran who has been issued a tab for persons with disabilities renews the disabled veteran's special registration plate or service or conflict registration plate under this section, the secretary of state shall issue a new tab for persons with disabilities to the disabled veteran, free of charge. The disabled veteran is not required to again furnish the proof required under subsection (8). (11) The use of a special registration plate, a service or conflict registration plate, or a tab for persons with disabilities issued under this section on a motor vehicle other than the motor vehicle for which the special registration plate or the service or conflict registration plate is issued, or by a person who does not qualify under this section, is a misdemeanor. (12) As used in this section, "private passenger motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is personally owned by a disabled veteran and is used for the primary purpose of transporting the disabled veteran and family members of the disabled veteran, but does not include a motor home. (13) As used in this section, "service or conflict registration plate" means a registration plate that is 1 of the following: (a) A registration plate issued under section 803e, 803i, 803j, 803k, 803l, 803n, 803o, 803t, or 803u. (b) Any other registration plate issued under this act that requires the applicant to be a current or former member of the United States Armed Forces Reserve or any branch of the United States Armed Forces.